Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2889, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2889. Homesteads, as defined in Section 2888 of this
title, are hereby classified for the purpose of taxation as provided
in Section 22 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution. All
homesteads in this state shall be assessed for taxation the same as
other real property therein, except that each homestead, as defined
by Section 2801 et seq. of this title, shall be exempted from all
forms of ad valorem taxation to the extent of One Thousand Dollars

HB4145 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

($1, 000.00) Seven Thousand Dollars ($7,000.00) of the assessed
valuation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RULES, dated 03/09/2026 - DO PASS,
As Amended and Coauthored.



















HB4145 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.